Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB319.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending Section 25 of the Constitution of
Kentucky to prohibit slavery and involuntary servitude in all circumstances, including as
punishment for a crime, while preserving the ability of prisoners to work while
imprisoned, as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 25 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
Slavery and involuntary servitude in this State are forbidden[, except as a
punishment for crime, whereof the party shall have been duly convicted]. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to prohibit a person convicted of a felony and sentenced to
imprisonment from being employed as described in Section 253 of this Constitution or
otherwise as may be provided by law.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of in KRS 118.415 to the contrary,
the Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general
circulation published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time
and in the same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for
their acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/4/2025 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1307
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of in KRS 118.415 to the contrary,
the Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in
August preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly
are to be chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in
September preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for
President and Vice President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question
in Section 1 of this Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of
Kentucky contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the
county clerk shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified,
indicated on the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to
the voting machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/4/2025 8:58 AM Jacketed